Hawaii statutes.
§457-5 Duties and powers of board. (a)
In addition to any other powers and duties authorized by law, the board may:

(1) Adopt, amend, or repeal rules, pursuant to
chapter 91, not inconsistent with the law, as may be necessary to enable it to
carry into effect this chapter, including the definition of the scope of
practice of nursing and the delegation of nursing tasks based upon professional
nursing standards, which include but are not limited to the standards set forth
by national certifying bodies recognized by the board;

(2) Prescribe standards for preparing persons for
licensure as practical nurses, registered nurses, and advanced practice
registered nurses under this chapter;

(3) Conduct surveys of educational programs as it may
deem necessary and practical;

(4) Approve educational programs that meet the
requirements of this chapter and the rules of the board;

(5) Deny or withdraw approval of educational programs
for failure to meet or maintain the standards prescribed in this chapter;

(6) License qualified applicants by examination or
endorsement, including advanced practice registered nurses, and renew,
reinstate, reactivate, and restore licenses and shall conduct an investigation
of the qualified applicant's background, character, competency, and integrity,
as the board deems appropriate. The board shall:

(A) Request, beginning July 1, 2017, the
criminal history records of qualified applicants, in accordance with section
846-2.7; and

(B) Request the criminal history records,
pursuant to section 846-2.7, of licensees who were issued licenses by the board
prior to July 1, 2017;

provided that the board shall request criminal
history records under this paragraph not less than once for each individual
qualified applicant or licensee; provided further that all requests for
criminal history records required for licensees issued a license by the board
prior to July 1, 2017, shall be made by the board no later than July 1, 2023.
The Hawaii criminal justice data center shall provide the information on
request to the director of commerce and consumer affairs;

(7) Conduct hearings upon request of a denied
applicant or upon charges calling for discipline of a licensee;

(8) Exercise the power to issue subpoenas, compel the
attendance of witnesses, and administer oaths to persons giving testimony at
hearings;

(9) Cause the prosecution of all persons violating
this chapter and incur necessary expenses therefor;

(10) Keep a record of all its proceedings;

(11) Provide consultation, conduct conferences,
forums, studies, and research on nursing education and practice;

(12) Communicate with national organizations that
promote the improvement of the legal standards of practice of nursing for the
protection of public health, safety, and welfare;

(13) Authorize the administration of examinations to
eligible applicants for licensure as registered nurses or licensed practical
nurses, or other examinations required by the board as designated in its rules;

(14) Employ, contract, and cooperate, to the extent
allowable by law, with any board-approved organization in the preparation and
grading of an appropriate nationally uniform examination; provided the board
shall retain sole discretion and responsibility for determining the standard of
successful completion of such an examination. When such a national examination
is used, access to questions and answers shall be restricted by the board; and

(15) Develop and adopt rules as necessary relating to
the practice of nursing in telehealth.

(b) The board shall monitor and evaluate the
scope of the practice of nursing in other states and make recommendations to
the legislature, when deemed desirable, for appropriate amendment to the
definitions under section 457-2 and any other provision of this chapter. [L
1970, c 71, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 57, §2; am L 1983, c 119, §3; am L 1984, c
182, §2; am L 1985, c 255, §5; am L 1992, c 202, §107; am L 1995, c 88, §1; am
L 2000, c 9, §2; am L 2014, c 46, §6; am L 2016, c 97, §2]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next